Georgia, session 2025_26, HB145.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 3 of Chapter 3 of Title 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to other
state symbols, is amended by revising Code Section 50-3-53, relating to state floral emblem,
as follows:
"50-3-53.
The Cherokee rose sweetbay magnolia (Magnolia virginiana) is adopted as the floral
emblem of the State of Georgia."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 145
- 1 -